Arkansas, session 2025, HB1703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 19 — Drug Reimbursement Process

23-99-1901. Definitions.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Contracting entity” means a healthcare insurer or a
subcontractor, affiliate, or other entity that contracts directly or
indirectly with a healthcare provider for the delivery of healthcare services
to patients;
(2)(A) "Drug" means a substance prescribed, administered, or
employed by a healthcare provider that is used to prevent, diagnose, treat,
or relieve symptoms of a disease, injury, or abnormal condition.
(B) "Drug" includes a prescription drug, medicine,
biological product, pharmaceutical, radiopharmaceutical, or other medical
supply;
(3)(A) "Health benefit plan" means a plan, policy, contract,
*ANS211*
03-18-2025 10:58:48 ANS211

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1703
certificate, agreement, or other evidence of coverage for healthcare services
offered or issued by a healthcare insurer in this state.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes indemnity and managed
care plans.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan;
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; or
(xi) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(4)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity that is subject to
state insurance regulation and provides health insurance in this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" includes:
(i) An insurance company;
(ii) A health maintenance organization; or
(iii) A hospital and medical service corporation.
(C) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(5) "Healthcare provider" means a person or entity that is
licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to
provide healthcare services; and
(6)(A) "Healthcare services" means services or goods provided
for the purpose of or incidental to the purpose of preventing, diagnosing,
03-18-2025 10:58:48 ANS211

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1703
treating, alleviating, relieving, curing, or healing human illness, disease,
condition, disability, or injury.
(B) "Healthcare services” includes services for the
diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or cure of a condition, illness, injury, or
disease.
(C) "Healthcare services" does not include a service
reimbursed through a pharmacy benefits manager licensed under the Arkansas
Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, § 23-92-501 et seq.

23-99-1902. Drug reimbursement process.
(a)(1) A contracting entity shall provide a reasonable administrative
appeal procedure to allow a healthcare provider to challenge the
reimbursement for a specific drug as being below the healthcare provider’s
drug acquisition cost.
(2) The reasonable administrative appeal procedure under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall include:
(A) A dedicated telephone number, email address, and
website for the purpose of submitting an administrative appeal;
(B) The ability to submit an administrative appeal
directly to the healthcare insurer or health benefit plan; and
(C) The ability to file an administrative appeal no less
than sixty (60) business days following the adjudication of a claim.
(b) If a challenge is made under subsection (a) of this section,
within thirty (30) business days of receipt of the challenge, the contracting
entity shall:
(1) If the appeal is upheld:
(A) Make the change in the reimbursement rate to at least
one hundred ten percent (110%) of the healthcare provider’s drug acquisition
cost;
(B) Reprocess, or cause the healthcare insurer or health
benefit plan to reprocess, the claim in question at the reimbursement rate
established under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section; and
(C) Process, or cause the healthcare insurer or health
benefit plan to reprocess, any subsequent claim for the same drug, as
identified by the National Drug Code or Healthcare Common Procedure Coding
System, at the reimbursement rate established in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of
03-18-2025 10:58:48 ANS211

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1703
this section; or
(2) If the appeal is denied, provide the challenging healthcare
provider with the specific information about the basis for the denial,
including without limitation any additional information necessary to
establish the drug acquisition cost.
(c) If an appeal is upheld under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the
rate established by the appeal shall remain in place:
(1) For an appeal initiated before the last month of a
contracting entity’s fiscal quarter, until the end of the fiscal quarter that
the appeal was initiated; and
(2) For an appeal initiated within the last month of a
contracting entity’s fiscal quarter, until the end of the fiscal quarter
following the quarter that the appeal was initiated.
(d)(1) A healthcare provider may provide a quarterly notice to a
contracting entity of all drugs with an acquisition cost below the contracted
reimbursement rate.
(2) If a contracting entity receives notice under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section, the contracting entity may change the reimbursement
rates to at least one hundred ten percent (110%) of the healthcare provider’s
drug acquisition cost without an appeal under this section.

/s/L. Johnson














03-18-2025 10:58:48 ANS211